Oklahoma, session 2025, SB399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1550.42, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1550.42. A. The following entities may create, publish

or otherwise manufacture an identification document, identification

card, or identification certificate and may possess an engraved

plate or other such device for the printing of such identification;

provided, the name of the issuing entity shall be clearly printed

upon the face of the identification:

1. Businesses, companies, corporations, service organizations

and federal, state and local governmental agencies for employee

Req. No. 319 Page 2

iden tification which is designed to identify the bearer as an

employee;

2. Businesses, companies, corporations and service

organizations for customer identification which is designed to

identify the bearer as a customer or member;

3. Federal, state and local government agencies for purposes

authorized or required by law or any legitimate purpose consistent

with the duties of such an agency, including, but not limited to,

voter identification cards, driver licenses, nondriver

identification cards, passports, birth certificates and social

security cards;

4. Any public school or state or private educational

institution, as defined by Sections 1-106, 21-101 or 3102 of Title

70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to identify the bearer as an

administrator, faculty member, student or employee;

5. Any professional organization or labor union to identify the

bearer as a member of the professional organization or labor union;

and

6. Businesses, companies or corporations which manufacture

medical-alert identification for the wearer thereof.

B. All identification documents as provided for in paragraph 3

or 4 of subsection A of this section shall be issued only to United

States citizens, nationals and legal permanent resident aliens.



Req. No. 319 Page 3

C. The provisions of subsection B of this section shall not

apply when an applicant presents, in person, valid documentary

evidence of:

1. A valid, unexpired immigrant or nonimmigrant visa status for

admission into the United States;

2. A pending or approved application for asylum in the United

States;

3. Admission into the United States in refugee status;

4. A pending or approved application for temporary protected

status in the United States;

5. Approved deferred action status; or

6. A pending application for adjustment of status to legal

permanent residence status or conditional resident status.

Upon approval, the applicant may be issued an identification

document provided for in paragraph 3 or 4 of subsection A of this

section. Such identification document shall be valid only during

the period of time of the authorized stay of the applicant in the

United States or, if there is no definite end to the period of

authorized stay, a period of one (1) year. Any identification

document issued pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall

clearly indicate that it is temporary and shall state the date that

the identification document expires. Such identification document

may be renewed only upon presentation of valid documentary evidence

that the status by which the applicant qualified for the

Req. No. 319 Page 4

iden tification document has been extended by the United States

Citizenship and Immigration Services or other authorized agency of

the United States Department of Homeland Security.

D. The provisions of subsection B of this section shall not

apply to an identification document described in paragraph 4 of

subsection A of this section that is only valid for use on the

campus or facility of that educational institution and includes a

statement of such restricted validity clearly and conspicuously

printed upon the face of the identification document.

E. Any driver license issued to a person who is not a United

States citizen, national or legal permanent resident alien for which

an application has been made for renewal, duplication or reissuance

shall be presumed to have been issued in accordance with the

provisions of subsection C of this section; provided that, at the

time the application is made, the driver license has not expired, or

been cancelled, suspended or revoked. The requirements of

subsection C of this section shall apply, however, to a renewal,

duplication or reissuance if the Department of Public Safety is

notified by a local, state or federal government agency of

information in the possession of the agency indicating a reasonable

suspicion that the individual seeking such renewal, duplication or

reissuance is present in the United States in violation of law. The

provisions of this subsection shall not apply to United States

citizens, nationals or legal permanent resident aliens.

Req. No. 319 Page 5

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-109.3, as

last amended by Section 1, Chapter 223, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 4-109.3), is amended to read as follows:

Section 4-109.3. A. When a qualified elector applies for

issuance or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license, or issuance of a

state identification card issued pursuant to Section 6-105 6-105.3

of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, he or she shall be provided

voter registration services as required by the National Voter

Registration Act of 1993. The person shall be asked whether he or

she wishes to register to vote or to change his or her address for

voting purposes. A person who declines to register shall confirm

such choice in writing or by electronic means. Completed electronic

voter registration applications shall be electronically transmitted

by the agency accepting the application to the State Election Board

or county election board. Completed paper voter registration

applications shall be transmitted by the agency accepting the

application at the close of business each week to the State Election

Board in preaddressed, postage prepaid envelopes provided by the

State Election Board. If a person registers or declines to register

to vote, the office at which the person submits the voter

registration application or the fact that the person declined to

register shall remain confidential and will be used only for voter

registration purposes.



Req. No. 319 Page 6

B. No voter registration services shall be offered to any

person who, at the time of an application for issuance or renewal of

an Oklahoma driver license or state identification card, provides

documentation that shows that the person is not a citizen of the

United States. Any applicant or licensee providing an individual

tax identification number to Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator

pursuant to Section 6-106 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall

not be provided voter registration services as the applicant or

licensee is not a qualified elector pursuant to this section.

C. A change of address for an Oklahoma driver license or state

identification card submitted by a registered voter shall also serve

as a change of address for voter registration purposes if the new

address is within the same county where the voter is registered to

vote. If the new address is outside the county where the voter is

currently registered to vote, the voter shall be sent a notice and

application with instructions for registering to vote at the new

address. A change of address for an Oklahoma driver license or

state identification card shall not be used to update a voter

registration address if the registrant states in writing or by

electronic means that the change of address is not for voter

registration purposes.

D. Licensed operators shall receive fifty cents ($0.50) per

valid paper voter registration application or application for change

in voter registration taken by themselves and employees of the

Req. No. 319 Page 7

lice nsed operator’s office taken at the licensed operator’s office,

payable by the State Election Board.

E. Service Oklahoma shall notify the Secretary of the State

Election Board of licensed operator appointments. Service Oklahoma

shall notify the Secretary of the State Election Board of licensed

operators qualified to issue driver licenses.

F. 1. Service Oklahoma shall electronically transmit to the

Secretary of the State Election Board, at least weekly, a complete

list of identifying information that shall include the name, date of

birth, residential address, mailing address, and driver license

number of all applicants or licensees who have provided an

individual tax identification number pursuant to Section 6-106 of

Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

2. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall compare the

transmitted identifying information provided pursuant to paragraph 1

of this subsection with the list of registered voters in each

county. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall notify the

secretary of any relevant county election board of any matches based

on the identifying information provided by Service Oklahoma.

3. Upon receipt of notification from the Secretary of the State

Election Board pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection, the

secretary of the county election board shall notify the proper

authority pursuant to Section 16-123 of this title to investigate



Req. No. 319 Page 8

whet her a violation related to voting crimes or voter registration

has occurred, and any unlawful voter registration shall be canceled.

4. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall not retain

the information provided pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection

after the completion of his or her duties pursuant to paragraph 2 of

this subsection except as may be necessary when assisting with an

investigation.

G. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall promulgate

rules and procedures to implement the requirements of this section.

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101, as

last amended by Section 34, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 6-101), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-101. A. No person, except those hereinafter

expressly exempted in Sections 6-102 and 6-102.1 of this title,

shall operate any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless

the person has a valid Oklahoma driver license for the class of

vehicle being operated under the provisions of this title. No

person shall be permitted to possess more than one valid license at

any time, except as provided in paragraph 4 of subsection F of this

section.

B. 1. No person shall operate a Class A commercial motor

vehicle unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and

holds a valid Class A commercial license, except as provided in

paragraph 5 and 6 of this subsection and subsection F E of this

Req. No. 319 Page 9

sect ion. Any person holding a valid Class A commercial license

shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes A, B, C and

D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.

2. No person shall operate a Class B commercial motor vehicle

unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a

valid Class B commercial license, except as provided in paragraph 5

of subsection F of this section. Any person holding a valid Class B

commercial license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in

Classes B, C and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this

subsection.

3. No person shall operate a Class C commercial motor vehicle

unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a

valid Class C commercial license, except as provided in subsection F

of this section. Any person holding a valid Class C commercial

license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes C

and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.

4. No person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be

licensed to operate any motor vehicle which is required to be

placarded for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172,

subpart F, except as provided in subsection F of this section;

provided, a person eighteen (18) years of age or older may be

licensed to operate a farm vehicle which is required to be placarded

for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172, subpart F,

except as provided in subsection F of this section.

Req. No. 319 Page 10

5. A person at least seventeen (17) years of age who

successfully completes all examinations required by law may be

issued by Service Oklahoma:

a. a restricted Class A commercial license which shall

grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class

A or Class B commercial motor vehicle for harvest

purposes or a Class D motor vehicle, or

b. a restricted Class B commercial license which shall

grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class

B commercial motor vehicle for harvest purposes or a

Class D motor vehicle.

6. No person shall operate a Class D motor vehicle unless the

person is sixteen (16) years of age or older and holds a valid Class

D license, except as provided for in Section 6-102 or 6-105 of this

title. Any person holding a valid Class D license shall be

permitted to operate motor vehicles in Class D only.

C. Any person issued a driver license pursuant to this section

may exercise the privilege thereby granted upon all streets and

highways in this state.

D. No person shall operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle

without having a valid Class A, B, C or D license with a motorcycle

endorsement. Except as otherwise provided by law, any new applicant

for an original driver license shall be required to successfully

complete a written examination, vision examination and driving

Req. No. 319 Page 11

exam ination for a motorcycle as prescribed by the Department of

Public Safety, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, and a certified

state-approved motorcycle basic rider course approved by the

Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, if the applicant

is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to be eligible for a

motorcycle endorsement thereon. The written examination and driving

examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service Oklahoma

upon verification that the person has successfully completed a

certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course approved by the

Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.

E. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who lawfully

possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license which is eligible for

renewal shall be required to successfully complete a written

examination, vision examination and driving examination for a

motorcycle as prescribed by the Department, in conjunction with

Service Oklahoma, and a certified state-approved motorcycle basic

rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service

Oklahoma, if the person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to

be eligible for a motorcycle endorsement. The written examination

and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service

Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully

completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course

approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.



Req. No. 319 Page 12

F. 1. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply

for a restricted Class A, B or C commercial learner permit. Service

Oklahoma, after the applicant has passed all parts of the

examination for a Class D license and has successfully passed all

parts of the examination for a Class A, B or C commercial license

other than the driving examination, may issue to the applicant a

commercial learner permit which shall entitle the person having

immediate lawful possession of the commercial learner permit and a

valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional driver license pursuant

to Section 6-212 of this title to operate a Class A, B or C

commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways solely for the

purpose of behind-the-wheel training in accordance with rules

promulgated by the Department.

2. This commercial learner permit shall be issued for a period

as provided in Section 6-115 of this title of one year; provided,

such commercial learner permit may be suspended, revoked, canceled,

denied or disqualified at the discretion of the Department, with

notice to Service Oklahoma, for violation of the restrictions, for

failing to give the required or correct information on the

application or for violation of any traffic laws of this state

pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle. Except as otherwise

provided, the lawful possessor of a commercial learner permit who

has been issued a commercial learner permit for a minimum of

fourteen (14) days may have the restriction requiring an

Req. No. 319 Page 13

acco mpanying driver removed by satisfactorily completing a driver’s

examination; provided, the removal of a restriction shall not

authorize the operation of a Class A, B or C commercial motor

vehicle if such operation is otherwise prohibited by law.

3. No person shall apply for and Service Oklahoma shall not

issue an original Class A, B or C driver license until the person

has been issued a commercial learner permit and held the permit for

at least fourteen (14) days. Any person who currently holds a Class

B or C license and who wishes to apply for another class of

commercial driver license shall be required to apply for a

commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at least

fourteen (14) days before applying for the Class A or B license, as

applicable. Any person who currently holds a Class A, B or C

license and who wishes to add an endorsement or remove a restriction

for which a skills examination is required shall be required to

apply for a commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at

least fourteen (14) days before applying for the endorsement.

4. A commercial learner permit shall be issued by Service

Oklahoma as a separate and unique document which shall be valid only

in conjunction with a valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional

driver license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title, both of

which shall be in the possession of the person to whom they have

been issued whenever that person is operating a commercial motor

vehicle as provided in this subsection.

Req. No. 319 Page 14

5. After one renewal of a commercial learner permit, as

provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a commercial permit

shall not be renewed again. Any person who has held a commercial

learner permit for the initial issuance period and one renewal

period shall not be eligible for and Service Oklahoma shall not

issue another renewal of the permit; provided, the person may

reapply for a new commercial learner permit, as provided for in this

subsection.

G. 1. For purposes of this title:

a. “REAL ID Compliant Driver License” or “Identification

Card” means a driver license or identification card

issued by this state that has been certified by the

United States Department of Homeland Security (USDHS)

as compliant with the requirements of the REAL ID Act

of 2005, Public Law No. 109-13. A REAL ID Compliant

Driver License or Identification Card and the process

through which it is issued incorporate a variety of

security measures designed to protect the integrity

and trustworthiness of the license or card. A REAL ID

Compliant Driver License or Identification Card will

be clearly marked on the face indicating that it is a

compliant document, and

b. “REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License” or

“Identification Card” means a driver license or

Req. No. 319 Page 15

identification card issued by this state that has not

been certified by the United States Department of

Homeland Security (USDHS) as being compliant with the

requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005. A REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card

will be clearly marked on the face indicating that it

is not compliant with the federal REAL ID Act of 2005

and is not acceptable for official federal purposes.

The driver license or identification card will have a

unique design or color indicator that clearly

distinguishes it from a compliant license or card.

2. Original Driver License and Identification Card Issuance:

a. Application for an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL

ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card

shall be made to Service Oklahoma or a licensed

operator provided such licensed operator is authorized

to process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver

Licenses and Identification Cards. Application for a

REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification

Card shall be made to Service Oklahoma.

b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed

operators shall perform all document recognition and

other requirements needed for approval of an original

REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification

Req. No. 319 Page 16

Card application. Service Oklahoma employees shall

perform all document recognition and other

requirements needed for approval of a REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card

application.

c. Upon approval of an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL

ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card

application, the applicant may take the approved

application document to a licensed operator to receive

a temporary driver license or identification card.

d. The licensed operator shall process the approved REAL

ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or

Identification Card application and upon payment shall

provide the applicant a temporary driver license or

identification card. A temporary driver license or

identification card shall afford the holder the

privileges otherwise granted by the specific class of

driver license or identification card for the period

of time listed on the temporary driver license or

identification card or the period of time prior to the

applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card,

whichever time period is shorter.



Req. No. 319 Page 17

3. REAL ID Compliant Driver License and Identification Card

Renewal and Replacement:

a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID

Compliant Driver License or Identification Card may be

made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator;

provided, such licensed operator is authorized to

process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver

Licenses and Identification Cards. A licensed

operator may process the voluntary downgrade of a REAL

ID Compliant Commercial Driver License to any lower

class license upon request of the licensee; provided,

no additional endorsements or restrictions are placed

on the license.

b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed

operators shall perform all document recognition and

other requirements needed for approval of a renewal or

replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card application.

c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID

Compliant Driver License or Identification Card

application, the applicant may receive a temporary

driver license or identification card from Service

Oklahoma or an authorized licensed operator.



Req. No. 319 Page 18

d. A temporary driver license or identification card

acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall

afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by

the specific class of driver license or identification

card being renewed or replaced for the period of time

listed on the temporary driver license or

identification card or the period of time prior to the

applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant Driver License

or Identification Card, whichever time period is

shorter.

e. For purposes of this title, an application for a REAL

ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card by

an individual with a valid Oklahoma-issued driver

license or identification card shall be considered a

renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card.

4. REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License and Identification Card

Renewal and Replacement:

a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card may

be made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator.

A licensed operator may process the voluntary

downgrade of a REAL ID Noncompliant Commercial Driver

License to any lower class license upon request of the

Req. No. 319 Page 19

licensee; provided, no additional endorsements or

restrictions are added to the license.

b. Service Oklahoma employees or licensed operators shall

perform all document recognition and other

requirements needed for approval of a renewal or

replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or

Identification Card application.

c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card

application, the applicant may receive a temporary

driver license or identification card from Service

Oklahoma or a licensed operator.

d. A temporary driver license or identification card

acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall

afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by

the specific class of driver license or identification

card being renewed or replaced for the period of time

listed on the temporary driver license or

identification card or the period of time prior to the

applicant receiving a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver

License or Identification Card, whichever time period

is shorter.

H. 1. The fee charged for an approved application for an

original Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver

Req. No. 319 Page 20

Lice nse or an approved application for the addition of an

endorsement to a current valid Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver License shall be assessed in accordance with the

following schedule:

Class A Commercial Learner

Permit $25.00

Class A Commercial License $25.00

Class B Commercial Learner

Permit $15.00

Class B Commercial License $15.00

Class C Commercial Learner

Permit $15.00

Class C Commercial License $15.00

Class D License $ 4.00

Motorcycle Endorsement $ 4.00

2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this

title, all monies collected from the fees charged for Class A, B and

C commercial licenses pursuant to the provisions of this subsection

shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.

I. The fee charged for any failed examination shall be Four

Dollars ($4.00) for any license classification. Notwithstanding the

provisions of Section 1104 of this title, all monies collected from

such examination fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection

shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.

Req. No. 319 Page 21

J. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of

subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or

renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License shall be in

accordance with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant

who has a CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement

fee for the issuance of the license:

License Class 4-year 8-year

Class A Commercial Learner

Permit $56.50 $113.00

Class A Commercial License $56.50 $113.00

Class B Commercial Learner

Permit $56.50 $113.00

Class B Commercial License $56.50 $113.00

Class C Commercial Learner

Permit $46.50 $93.00

Class C Commercial License $46.50 $93.00

Class D License $38.50 $77.00

In addition to the cost of the issuance or renewal of a Class D

License as provided in this subsection, an applicant or licensee

providing an individual tax identification number (ITIN) shall pay

an additional Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for a total cost of Eighty-

eight Dollars and fifty cents ($88.50) for a four (4) year license.

No applicant or licensee providing an ITIN shall receive an eight

(8) year license.

Req. No. 319 Page 22

K. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of

subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or

renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License shall be in accordance

with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant who has a

CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement fee for the

issuance of the license:

License Class 4-year 8-year

REAL ID Compliant Class A

Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00

REAL ID Compliant Class A

Commercial License $56.50 $113.00

REAL ID Compliant Class B

Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00

REAL ID Compliant Class B

Commercial License $56.50 $113.00

REAL ID Compliant Class C

Commercial Learner Permit $46.50 $93.00

REAL ID Compliant Class C

Commercial License $46.50 $93.00

REAL ID Compliant Class D

License $38.50 $77.00

L. A commercial learner permit may be renewed one time for a

period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The cost for the renewed

permit shall be the same as for the original permit.

Req. No. 319 Page 23

M. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this

title, of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsections

J, K and L of this section:

1. Five Dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of a 4-year license or

Eleven Dollars ($11.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to

the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-

2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

2. Six Dollars and seventy-five cents ($6.75) of a 4-year

license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-year

license shall be deposited to the Department of Public Safety

Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the

purpose of administration and maintenance of the computerized

imaging system of the Department through October 31, 2022.

Beginning November 1, 2022, Six Dollars and seventy-five cents

($6.75) of a 4-year license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents

($13.50) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service

Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely

for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the

computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;

3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars

($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Department

of Public Safety Revolving Fund for all original or renewal

issuances of licenses through October 31, 2022. Beginning November

1, 2022, Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars

Req. No. 319 Page 24

($20 .00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service

Oklahoma Revolving Fund for all original or renewal issuances of

licenses; and

4. Five Dollars ($5.00) of a 4-year license or Six Dollars

($6.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the State Public

Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title.

N. All original and renewal driver licenses shall expire as

provided in Section 6-115 of this title.

O. 1. Through May 31, 2025, any person sixty-two (62) to

sixty-four (64) years of age during the calendar year of issuance or

renewal of a Class D license or motorcycle endorsement shall be

charged the following prorated fee:

4-year 8-year

Age 62 $21.25 $42.50

Age 63 $17.50 $35.00

Age 64 $13.75 $27.50

2. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older during the

calendar year of issuance or renewal of a Class D license or

motorcycle endorsement shall not be charged a fee.

P. No person who has been honorably discharged from active

service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or

Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United

States Department of Veterans Affairs, its successor or the Armed

Forces of the United States to be a disabled veteran in receipt of

Req. No. 319 Page 25

comp ensation at the one-hundred-percent rate for a permanent

disability sustained through military action or accident resulting

from disease contracted while in such active service and registered

with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of

Veterans Affairs shall be charged a fee for the issuance,

replacement or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license; provided, that

if a veteran has been previously exempt from a fee pursuant to this

subsection, no registration with the veterans registry shall be

required.

Q. In accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this

section, Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the

issuance and renewal of driver licenses authorized pursuant to the

provisions of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title; provided,

that no such rules applicable to the issuance or renewal of REAL ID

Noncompliant Driver Licenses shall create more stringent standards

than such rules applicable as of January 1, 2017, unless directly

related to a specific change in statutory law concerning standards

for REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses. Applications, upon forms

approved by Service Oklahoma, for such licenses shall be handled, in

accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this section, by

the licensed operator; provided, Service Oklahoma is authorized to

assume these duties in any county of this state. Each licensed

operator accepting applications for driver licenses shall receive

Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License

Req. No. 319 Page 26

or T welve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver

License or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Compliant

Driver License or Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for an 8-year REAL ID

Compliant Driver License to be deducted from the total collected for

each license or renewal application accepted through June 30, 2023.

Beginning July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2023, each motor

license agent or licensed operator accepting applications for driver

licenses for individuals over the age of sixty-five (65) years or

for applications for drivers pursuant to subsection P of this

section shall receive Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year driver

license or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year driver license to

be deducted daily by the motor license agent or licensed operator

receipts. Beginning July 1, 2023, these fees shall be retained by

the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of

this title. The fees received by the licensed operator, authorized

by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses. The

amount retained pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by

any state agency. The fees received by the licensed operator,

authorized by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses.

For purposes of this subsection, “licensed operator” shall mean an

individual who obtains a license from the Service Oklahoma Operator

Board to operate a designated Service Oklahoma location and offers

third-party fulfillment of designated services to be rendered by

Service Oklahoma.

Req. No. 319 Page 27

R. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this title

and subsection Q of this section and except as provided in

subsections H and M of this section, the first Sixty Thousand

Dollars ($60,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to this

section shall be paid by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the State

Treasurer to be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of the State

Treasury.

The next Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of monies

collected pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Tax

Commission to the State Treasurer to be deposited each fiscal year

under the provisions of this section to the credit of the Department

of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund for the purpose of the

Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunications System. All other

monies collected in excess of Five Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars

($560,000.00) each fiscal year shall be apportioned as provided in

Section 1104 of this title, except as otherwise provided in this

section.

S. Service Oklahoma shall retain the images displayed on

licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions

of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title which may be used

only:

1. By a law enforcement agency for purposes of criminal

investigations, missing person investigations or any law enforcement



Req. No. 319 Page 28

purp ose which is deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Public

Safety;

2. By the driver licensing agency of another state for its

official purpose; and

3. As provided in Section 2-110 of this title.

All agencies approved by the Oklahoma Law Enforcement

Telecommunications System (OLETS) or the National Law Enforcement

Telecommunications System (NLETS) to receive photographs or

computerized images may obtain them through OLETS or through NLETS.

Photographs or computerized images may be obtained by law

enforcement one inquiry at a time.

The computer system and related equipment acquired for this

purpose must conform to industry standards for interoperability and

open architecture. The Department of Public Safety may promulgate

rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

T. No person may hold more than one state-issued or territory-

issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID Compliant

Identification Card from Oklahoma or any other state or territory.

Service Oklahoma shall not issue a REAL ID Compliant Driver License

to a person who has been previously issued a REAL ID Compliant

Driver License or REAL ID Compliant Identification Card until such

license or identification card has been surrendered to Service

Oklahoma by the applicant. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules



Req. No. 319 Page 29

rela ted to the issuance of replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver

Licenses in the event of loss or theft.

U. Beginning May 24, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2023, in

addition to the amounts provided in subsection Q of this section, a

licensed operator shall receive Five Dollars ($5.00) for each

processed application for a REAL ID Compliant 4-year Driver License

and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each processed application for a REAL

ID Compliant 8-year Driver License. Any additional amounts provided

pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by Service

Oklahoma.

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as

amended by Section 40, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-103. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, Service

Oklahoma shall not issue a driver license to:

1. Any person who is under eighteen (18) years of age, except

that Service Oklahoma may issue a Class D license to any person who

attains sixteen (16) years of age on or after August 15, 2000, and

meets the requirements of Sections Section 6-105 and 6-107.3 of this

title;

2. Any unemancipated person who is under eighteen (18) years of

age and whose custodial legal parent or legal guardian does not

approve the issuance of a license as required by Section 6-110.2 of



Req. No. 319 Page 30

this title or objects to the issuance of a license or permit by

filing an objection pursuant to Section 6-103.1 of this title;

3. Any person whose driving privilege has been suspended,

revoked, canceled or denied in this state or any other state or

country until the driving privilege has been reinstated by the state

or country withdrawing the privilege;

4. Any person who is classified as an excessive user of

alcohol, any other intoxicating substance, or a combination of

alcohol and any other intoxicating substance, and inimical to public

safety, in accordance with rules promulgated by the Department,

until all requirements granting or reinstating driving privileges

are met, including, but not limited to, abstinence from the use of

alcohol, any other intoxicating substance, or any combination of

alcohol and any other intoxicating substance for a minimum of either

twelve (12) months or eighteen (18) months, as determined by OAC

595:10-5 260:135-5, immediately preceding application for or

application for reinstatement of driving privileges;

5. Any person who is required by Section 6-101 et seq. of this

title to take an examination, unless the person shall have

successfully passed the examination;

6. Any person who is required under the laws of this state to

deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited

such proof;



Req. No. 319 Page 31

7. Any person who is physically deformed or who is afflicted

with any mental disease or physical condition that would impair the

driving ability of the person or when the Commissioner of Public

Safety, from information concerning the person or from the records

and reports on file in the Department of Public Safety, determines

that the operation of a motor vehicle by such person on the highways

would be inimical to public safety or welfare;

8. Any person who is a nonresident, as defined in Section 1-137

of this title;

9. Any alien unless such person presents valid documentation of

identity and by presenting either:

a. an authorization for presence in the United States

issued pursuant to the laws of the United States;

provided, that no license shall be issued to any alien

whose documentation indicates the alien is a current

visitor or is not eligible to establish residency; or

b. proof of having filed a state tax return for the 2025

tax year; or

10. Any person who possesses a valid license to operate a motor

vehicle issued by another state until the other state license has

been surrendered.

B. Any applicant who is denied a license under the provisions

of subsection A of this section shall have the right to an appeal as

provided in Section 6-211 of this title.

Req. No. 319 Page 32

SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-106, as

last amended by Section 5, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 6-106), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-106. A. 1. Every application for a driver license

or identification card shall be made by the applicant upon a form

furnished by Service Oklahoma.

2. Every original, renewal, or replacement application for a

driver license or identification card made by a male applicant who

is at least sixteen (16) but less than twenty-six (26) years of age

shall include a statement that by submitting the application, the

applicant is consenting to registration with the Selective Service

System. The pertinent information from the application shall be

forwarded by Service Oklahoma to the Data Management Center of the

Selective Service System in order to register the applicant as

required by law with the Selective Service System. Any applicant

refusing to sign the consent statement shall be denied a driver

license or identification card.

3. Except as provided for in subsections G and H of this

section, every applicant for a driver license or identification card

shall provide to Service Oklahoma at the time of application a

document showing proof of identity. Service Oklahoma shall

promulgate rules prescribing forms of identification acceptable for

an original Oklahoma driver license.



Req. No. 319 Page 33

B. Every applicant for a driver license shall provide the

following information:

1. Full name;

2. Date of birth;

3. Sex;

4. Address of principal residence and county of such residence

which shall be referenced on the REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card; proof of principal residency, as prescribed by

rules promulgated by Service Oklahoma, documenting provided address;

5. Current and complete mailing address to be maintained by

Service Oklahoma for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as

required by Section 2-116 of this title;

6. Medical information, as determined by the Department Service

Oklahoma, which shall assure Service Oklahoma that the person is not

prohibited from being licensed as provided by paragraph 7 of

subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;

7. Whether the applicant is deaf or hard-of-hearing;

8. A brief description of the applicant, as determined by the

Department Service Oklahoma;

9. Whether the applicant has previously been licensed, and, if

so, when and by what state or country, and whether any license has

ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an application has ever

been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension,

revocation or refusal;

Req. No. 319 Page 34

10. Whether the applicant is an alien eligible to be considered

for licensure and is not prohibited from licensure pursuant to

paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;

11. Whether the applicant has:

a. previously been licensed and, if so, when and by what

state or country, and

b. held more than one license at the same time during the

immediately preceding ten (10) years; and

12. Social Security number or an individual tax identification

number (ITIN) issued by the Internal Revenue Service.

No person shall request Service Oklahoma to use the Social Security

number or ITIN of that person as the driver license number. Upon

renewal or replacement of any driver license issued after the

effective date of this act July 1, 2001, the licensee shall advise

Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator if the present driver

license number of the licensee is the Social Security number or ITIN

of the licensee. If the driver license number is the Social

Security number or ITIN, Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator

shall change the driver license number to a computer-generated

alphanumeric identification. An applicant providing only an

individual tax identification number shall not be eligible to be

issued a commercial driver license or a voter identification card.

C. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B

of this section, every applicant for a commercial driver license who

Req. No. 319 Page 35

is s ubject to the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 391, and is

applying for an original, renewal, or replacement license, and every

person who, upon or after May 8, 2012, is currently the holder of a

commercial driver license and is subject to the requirements of 49

C.F.R., Part 391, and who does not apply for a renewal or

replacement license prior to January 30, 2014, shall submit to

Service Oklahoma and maintain with Service Oklahoma a current

approved medical examination certificate signed by a licensed

physician authorized to perform and approve medical examination

certifications. Service Oklahoma shall adopt rules for maintaining

medical examination certificates pursuant to the requirements in 49

C.F.R., Parts 383 and 384. Any commercial driver licensee subject

to the requirements of this paragraph who fails to maintain on file

with Service Oklahoma a current, approved medical examination

certificate shall have the driving privileges of the person

downgraded to a Class D driver license by Service Oklahoma.

2. If the applicant is applying for an original commercial

driver license in Oklahoma or is transferring a commercial driver

license from another state to Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall

review the driving record of the applicant in other states for the

immediately preceding ten (10) years, unless the record review has

already been performed by Service Oklahoma. As a result of the

review, if it is determined by Service Oklahoma that the applicant

is subject to a period of disqualification as prescribed by Section

Req. No. 319 Page 36

6-20 5.2 of this title which has not yet been imposed, Service

Oklahoma shall impose the period of disqualification and the

applicant shall serve the period of disqualification before a

commercial driver license is issued to the applicant; provided,

nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the issuance

of a Class D driver license to the applicant.

3. If the applicant has or is applying for a hazardous material

endorsement, the applicant shall submit to a security threat

assessment performed by the Transportation Security Administration

of the Department of Homeland Security as required by and pursuant

to 49 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to determine whether

the applicant is eligible for the endorsement pursuant to federal

law and regulation.

4. Service Oklahoma shall notify each commercial driving school

of the passage of this section, and each commercial driving school

shall notify prospective students of its school of the hazardous

material endorsement requirement.

D. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B of

this section, every applicant shall be given an option on the

application for issuance of a driver license or identification card

or renewal pursuant to Section 6-115 of this title to provide an

emergency contact person. The emergency contact information

requested may include full name, address, and phone number. The

emergency contact information shall be maintained by Service

Req. No. 319 Page 37

Okla homa and shall be used by Service Oklahoma and law enforcement

for emergency purposes only. A person listed as an emergency

contact may request to be removed at any time. Any update to a

change of name, address, or phone number may be made by the

applicant listing the emergency contact person or by the person

listed as the emergency contact.

E. Whenever application is received from a person previously

licensed in another jurisdiction, Service Oklahoma shall request a

copy of the driving record from the other jurisdiction and,

effective September 1, 2005, from all other jurisdictions in which

the person was licensed within the immediately previous ten (10)

years. When received, the driving record shall become a part of the

driving record of the person in this state with the same force and

effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the

original instance.

F. Whenever Service Oklahoma receives a request for a driving

record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be

forwarded without charge.

G. A person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-

issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of

this title. A valid and unexpired Oklahoma driver license shall

serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever

application for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card is

Req. No. 319 Page 38

subm itted to Service Oklahoma. The provisions of subsection B of

Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply

when issuing an identification card pursuant to the provisions of

this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary

to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.

H. A valid and unexpired U.S. passport of any country shall

serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever

application for a driver license or identification card is submitted

to the Department Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall

promulgate rules necessary to implement and administer the

provisions of this subsection.

SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-114, as

last amended by Section 7, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 6-114), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-114. A. 1. In the event that a driver license is

lost, destroyed, or requires the updating of any information,

restriction or endorsement displayed thereon, the person to whom

such license was issued may obtain a replacement thereof pursuant to

the provisions of subsection G of Section 6-101 of this title, and

upon payment of the required fee. If the person is an alien, the

person shall appear before Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator

and, after furnishing proof of identity as required in this section,

shall be issued a replacement driver license for a period which does

not exceed the lesser of:

Req. No. 319 Page 39

a. the expiration date of the license being replaced, or

b. the expiration date on the valid documentation

authorizing the presence of the person in the United

States, as required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of

Section 6-103 of this title.

2. The cost of a replacement license shall be Twenty-five

Dollars ($25.00), of which:

a. Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be apportioned as provided

in Section 1104 of this title,

b. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be remitted to the State

Treasurer to be credited to the General Revenue Fund,

c. Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be credited to the

Department of Public Safety Computer Imaging System

Revolving Fund to be used solely for the purpose of

administering and maintaining the computer imaging

system of the Department through October 31, 2022.

Beginning November 1, 2022, Five Dollars ($5.00) shall

be credited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging

System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the

purpose of administering and maintaining the computer

imaging system of Service Oklahoma,

d. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be credited to the

Revolving Fund of the Department of Public Safety

Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning

Req. No. 319 Page 40

November 1, 2022, the Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be

credited to the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund,

e. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited to the State

Public Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this

title, and

f. (1) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this

paragraph related to the replacement of a driver

license by a licensed operator that does not

process approved applications or renewals for

REAL ID Compliant Driver Licenses or

Identification Cards shall be deposited, in

addition to the amount authorized by subparagraph

e of this paragraph, to the State Public Safety

Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title, or

(2) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this

paragraph related to the replacement of a driver

license by a licensed operator that does process

approved applications or renewals for REAL ID

Compliant Driver Licenses or Identification Cards

shall be retained by the licensed operator

through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2023,

these monies shall be retained by the licensed

operator pursuant to subsection E of Section

1141.1 of this title.

Req. No. 319 Page 41

3. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules prescribing forms of

primary and secondary identification acceptable for replacement of

an Oklahoma driver license; provided, however, a valid and unexpired

U.S. passport of any country shall be acceptable as both primary and

secondary identification.

B. Any person desiring to add or remove an endorsement or

endorsements or a restriction or restrictions to any existing driver

license, when authorized by Service Oklahoma, shall obtain a

replacement license with the endorsement or endorsements or the

restriction or restrictions change thereon and shall be charged the

fee for a replacement license as provided in subsection A of this

section.

SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-115, as

amended by Section 55, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 6-115), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-115. A. Except as otherwise provided in this

section, every driver license shall be issued for a period of either

four (4) years or eight (8) years; provided, if the applicant or

licensee is an alien provides an individual tax identification

number pursuant to Section 6-106 of this title, the license shall be

issued for a period which does not exceed the lesser of:

1. Four (4) years or eight (8) years; or

2. The expiration date on the valid documentation authorizing

the presence of the applicant or licensee in the United States, as

Req. No. 319 Page 42

requ ired by paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this

title four (4) years.

B. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expiration

date of an initial license shall be no more than either four (4)

years or eight (8) years from the last day of the month of issuance

or no more than either four (4) years or eight (8) years from the

last day of the birth month of the applicant immediately preceding

the date of issuance, if requested by the applicant.

C. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expiration

date of a renewal license shall be:

1. For a renewal during the month of expiration, either four

(4) years or eight (8) years from the last day of the month of

expiration of the expiring license or either four (4) or eight (8)

years from the last day of the birth month of the licensee

immediately preceding the expiration date of the expiring license,

if requested by the licensee; or

2. For a renewal prior to the month of expiration, as provided

by rule of Service Oklahoma, either four (4) or eight (8) years from

the last day of the month of expiration of the current license;

provided, no license shall be issued with an expiration date of more

than five (5) years from the date of renewal on a four (4) year

license or nine (9) years from the date of renewal on an eight (8)

year license.



Req. No. 319 Page 43

D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of Section

1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any Any Oklahoma

driver license that is not more than one (1) year past the date of

expiration provided on the driver license shall be presumed to be a

valid form of identification for the purposes of renewing an

Oklahoma driver license.

E. Except as otherwise provided in this section, every driver

license shall be renewable by the licensee upon application to

either Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator, furnishing the

current mailing address of the person and payment of the required

fee, if the person is otherwise eligible for renewal. If the

licensee is an alien applicant that was previously issued a driver

license after confirmation by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to Service

Oklahoma that the applicant filed a 2025 state tax return pursuant

to subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title and an individual tax

identification number pursuant to subsection B of Section 6-106 of

this title, then the licensee shall appear before a driver license

examiner of Service Oklahoma and shall be issued a renewal driver

license for a period which does not exceed the lesser of:

1. Four (4) years or eight (8) years; or

2. The expiration date on the valid documentation authorizing

the presence of the applicant or licensee in the United States, as

required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this

title or a licensed operator, whereupon the Tax Commission shall

Req. No. 319 Page 44

conf irm to Service Oklahoma that the applicant has filed a state tax

return for each year between the date of issuance of the license and

for the year prior to the expiration of the license.

F. All applicants for renewals of driver licenses who have

proven collision records or apparent physical defects may be

required to take an examination as specified by Service Oklahoma.

G. When a person makes application for a driver license, or

makes application to renew a driver license, and the person has been

convicted of, or received a deferred judgment for, any offense

required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act,

the driver license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from

the month of issuance, but may be renewed yearly during the time the

person is registered on the Sex Offender Registry sex offender

registry. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the cost for

such license shall be the same as for other driver licenses and

renewals.

H. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules prescribing forms of

identification acceptable for the renewal of an Oklahoma driver

license.

SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-122, as

last amended by Section 8, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 6-122), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-122. Service Oklahoma may develop procedures whereby

driver licenses issued under the provisions of Section 6-101 et seq.

Req. No. 319 Page 45

of t his title may be renewed or replaced by the applicant by mail or

online except for licenses to be renewed or replaced by aliens by

applicants having previously provided proof of having filed a state

tax return and an individual tax identification number as prescribed

by subsection E of Section 6-115 of this title. Any license issued

pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period as prescribed

in Section 6-115 of this title. Service Oklahoma shall not renew or

replace a license by mail or online unless there has been an

issuance, renewal or replacement driver license done in person by

the applicant within the last sixteen (16) years.

Provided, any person or the spouse or dependent of a person:

1. Who is on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United

States; or

2. Who is currently employed as a civilian contractor with the

Armed Forces of the United States,

living outside of Oklahoma and having a valid Class D driver license

issued by the State of Oklahoma this state, requiring no material

change, may apply for no more than three consecutive renewals or

replacement of such license by mail or online, in accordance with

Service Oklahoma rules. A fourth consecutive renewal or replacement

must be done in person.

SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-126 of Title 47, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 319 Page 46

A. Service Oklahoma shall make space available on the

credential line of the front of a driver license issued to an

applicant who provided an individual tax identification number to

prominently print “ITIN Non-citizen”, which shall be designed by

Service Oklahoma and shall serve as a notation of status as a non-

citizen of the United States.

B. Service Oklahoma shall include the words “License holder is

not a U.S. citizen and is ineligible to vote in any election” on all

driver licenses affixed with “ITIN Non-citizen” as required by

subsection A of this section.

C. An applicant or licensee who provides an individual tax

identification number to Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator

shall be prohibited from receiving voter registration services as

described in subsection A of Section 4-109.3 of Title 26 of the

Oklahoma Statutes.

D. For any driver license issued pursuant to Section 6-106 of

Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the driver license found in Field

4 shall begin with the letters “ITIN”.

SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-319 MSBB 1/14/2025 3:50:58 PM







Req. No. 319 Page 47